apertium-epo-fra.fra.dix
<pardef n="I__num">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/un__num">
  <e>       <p><l>un</l>        <r>un<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="baron__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esse</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>esses</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="colonel__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="guionet">
  <e>       <p><l>-</l>         <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="coma">
  <e>       <re>,</re><p><l></l><r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>&quot;</l>    <r>&quot;<s n="cit"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="combien__rel">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="comme__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="commercia/l__n" c="autoconcord:m_f,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>les</l>       <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ux</l>        <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="compl/aire__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aira</l>      <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airai</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airaient</l>  <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airais</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airais</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airait</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airas</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aire</l>      <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airez</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airiez</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airions</l>   <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airons</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>airont</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ais</l>       <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisaient</l>  <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisais</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisais</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisait</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisant</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e>       <p><l>aisant</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e> -->
  <e>       <p><l>aise</l>      <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aise</l>      <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisent</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisent</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aises</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisez</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisez</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisez</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisiez</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisiez</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisions</l>   <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisions</l>   <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisons</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisons</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aisons</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aît</l>       <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>urent</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usse</l>      <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussent</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>usses</l>     <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussiez</l>    <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ussions</l>   <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ut</l>        <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ûmes</l>      <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ût</l>        <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ûtes</l>      <r>aire<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="compte/_rendu__n" c="autoconcord:m,sgpl">
  <e>       <p><l><b/>rendu</l> <r><b/>rendu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s<b/>rendus</l><r><b/>rendu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="bailleur">        <i>bailleur</i><par n="baron__n"/></e>
<e lm="baron">           <i>baron</i><par n="baron__n"/></e>
<e lm="bisexuel">        <i>bisexuel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="colonel">         <i>colonel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="combien">         <i>combien</i><par n="combien__rel"/></e>
<e lm="combien">         <i>combien</i><par n="comme__adv"/></e>
<e lm="comme">           <i>comme</i><par n="combien__rel"/></e>
<e lm="commensal">       <i>commensa</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="comment">         <i>comment</i><par n="comme__adv"/></e>
<e lm="commercial">      <i>commercia</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="complaire">       <i>compl</i><par n="compl/aire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compte rendu">    <i>compte</i><par n="compte/_rendu__n"/></e>
<e lm="criminel">        <i>criminel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="D">               <i>D</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="déplaire">        <i>dépl</i><par n="compl/aire__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="où">       <p><l>oú</l>        <r>où</r></p><par n="combien__rel"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="où">       <p><l>oú</l>        <r>où</r></p><par n="comme__adv"/></e>
<e r="RL" lm="tout comme"><i>tout<b/>comme</i><par n="combien__rel"/></e>
<e lm="hétérosexuel" a="webform"><i>hétérosexuel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="homosexuel" a="webform"><i>homosexuel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="I">               <i>I</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="II">              <i>II</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="III">             <i>III</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="intellectuel">    <i>intellectuel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="IV">              <i>IV</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="IX">              <i>IX</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="L">               <i>L</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="libéral">         <i>libéra</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="M">               <i>M</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="mortel">          <i>mortel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="néolibéral">      <i>néolibéra</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="nord-occidental"> <i>nord-occidenta</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="nord-oriental">   <i>nord-orienta</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="occidental">      <i>occidenta</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="officiel">        <i>officiel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="oriental">        <i>orienta</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="où">              <i>où</i><par n="combien__rel"/></e>
<e lm="où">              <i>où</i><par n="comme__adv"/></e>
<e lm="plaire">          <i>pl</i><par n="compl/aire__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pour quelle raison"><i>pour<b/>quelle<b/>raison</i><par n="comme__adv"/></e>
<e lm="pourquoi">        <i>pourquoi</i><par n="comme__adv"/></e>
<e lm="professionnel">   <i>professionnel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="Provençal">       <i>Provença</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="quaker">          <i>quaker</i><par n="baron__n"/></e>
<e lm="quand">           <i>quand</i><par n="combien__rel"/></e>
<e lm="quand">           <i>quand</i><par n="comme__adv"/></e>
<e lm="radical">         <i>radica</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="rival">           <i>riva</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="romanichel">      <i>romanichel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="sud-occidental">  <i>sud-occidenta</i><par n="commercia/l__n"/></e>
<e lm="transsexuel">     <i>transsexuel</i><par n="colonel__n"/></e>
<e lm="un">              <i></i><par n="/un__num"/></e>
<e lm="un">              <par n="/un__num"/></e>
<e lm="V">               <i>V</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="VI">              <i>VI</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="VII">             <i>VII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="VIII">            <i>VIII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="X">               <i>X</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XI">              <i>XI</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XII">             <i>XII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIII">            <i>XIII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIV">             <i>XIV</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XIX">             <i>XIX</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XV">              <i>XV</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVI">             <i>XVI</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVII">            <i>XVII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XVIII">           <i>XVIII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XXI">             <i>XXI</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e lm="XXIII">           <i>XXIII</i><par n="I__num"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="coma"/></e>
<e>                      <par n="guionet"/></e>
